North Carolina, session 2025, HB598.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Chapter 75 of the General Statutes is amended by adding a new
Article to read:
"Article 9.
"Live Event Ticket Sales and Resales."
SECTION 1.(b) Subsections (a) and (c) of G.S. 75-44 are recodified as subsections
(a) and (b), respectively, of G.S. 75-151, to be titled "Definitions; enforcement," to be located in
Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, as established by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.(c) Subsection (b) of G.S. 75-44 is recodified as G.S. 75-152, to be
titled "Ticket price transparency," to be located in Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes,
as established by subsection (a) of this section.
SECTION 1.(d) Article 9 of Chapter 75 of the General Statutes, as established by
subsection (a) of this section, reads as rewritten:
"Article 9.
"Live Event Ticket Sales and Resales.
"§ 75-151. Definitions; enforcement.
(a) As used in this section Article, the following definitions apply:
(1) Entertainment event. – A sporting game or contest, concert, or other
entertainment performance with a live presentation element in this State for
which attendance is available to the public through the purchase of ticket.
(2) Mandatory fee. – Any fee or surcharge that a consumer must pay in order to
purchase a ticket to an entertainment event.
(3) Resale. – The second or subsequent sale of a ticket through a website or other
electronic means.
(4) Reseller. – A person engaged in the resale of tickets.
(5) Secondary ticket exchange. – An electronic marketplace that enables persons
to sell, purchase, and resell tickets.
(6) Ticket issuer. – The person that is the first seller of tickets for an entertainment
event, including a musician or musical group, an operator of a venue, sponsor
or a promoter of an entertainment event, a sports team participating in an
entertainment event, a sports league whose teams are participating in an
*H598-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
entertainment event, a theater company, a marketplace or service operated for
consumers to make an initial purchase of tickets, or an agent of any of the
persons listed in this subdivision.
(7) Ticketing session. – The period of time beginning when the price of a ticket
to an entertainment event is first displayed to a person through a website or
application and ending when the person has not purchased the ticket within
the time period prescribed by the secondary ticket exchange, ticket issuer, or
reseller.
(b) A violation of this section Article is an unfair trade practice under G.S. 75-1.1 and is
subject to all of the investigative, enforcement, and penalty provisions of an unfair trade practice
under this Article.Chapter.
"§ 75-152. Ticket price transparency.
A secondary ticket exchange, ticket issuer, or reseller shall meet the following requirements
when listing a ticket for sale or resale:
(1) At any time the price of the ticket is displayed to the purchaser, the listing
shall clearly and conspicuously disclose the total price of the ticket, including
all mandatory fees and the maximum order processing fee, if any.
(2) The total price of the ticket initially displayed at the beginning of a ticketing
session shall not be increased during that ticketing session, except by the
addition of the charges permitted under subdivision (4) of this subsection.
(3) The listing shall clearly and conspicuously disclose to the consumer the
existence and actual dollar amount of each mandatory fee, if any, prior to the
completion of the transaction. The descriptor used to identify each mandatory
fee shall not be deceptive or misleading.
(4) The following charges are not mandatory fees and may be added to the ticket
price and shall be disclosed to the purchaser prior to purchase of the ticket:
a. Actual charges required to deliver a non-electronic ticket to the
address specified by the purchaser by the delivery method designated
by the purchaser.
b. Taxes or fees imposed on the transaction by any government.
c. A reasonable fee for processing the order.
"§ 75-153. Restrictions for ticket issuers.
(a) A ticket issuer shall not restrict or hinder the ability of a purchaser that has purchased
a ticket from a ticket issuer from doing any of the following:
(1) Reselling a ticket independently of the primary ticket seller or any secondary
ticket exchange owned or affiliated with the ticket issuer.
(2) Reselling a ticket on the secondary ticket exchange of the purchaser's
choosing.
(b) A ticket issuer may not require a minimum or maximum price for the resale of a ticket
purchased from the issuer.
(c) A ticket issuer may not sanction, discriminate against, or deny a purchaser admission
to an event, deny rights to bundled series tickets or the renewal thereof, or otherwise discriminate
against a secondary ticket exchange seller or purchaser on the basis that the ticket was resold,
gifted, or purchased as a resold ticket.
(d) A ticket issuer shall deliver an electronic ticket to a purchaser within 72 hours of
confirming the purchase order, unless the event occurs within 72 hours of the purchase, in which
case a ticket issuer shall deliver the ticket as soon as reasonably possible following purchase
order confirmation.
(e) Nothing in this section prohibits an operator of a live entertainment venue from doing
any of the following:
Page 2 House Bill 598-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(1) Maintaining and enforcing policies regarding conduct or behavior at or in
connection with the operator's live entertainment venue.
(2) Establishing limits on the quantity of tickets that may be purchased.
(3) Selling or gifting nontransferable tickets to an event for either of the following
reasons:
a. The event is a private event.
b. The ticket is offered at a discounted price to only a select group of
people, including students, veterans, or members of an organization.
Nontransferable tickets issued under this sub-subdivision shall be
clearly marked as nontransferable and shall not be offered
promotionally to the general public.
"§ 75-154. Secondary ticket exchange website addresses.
A secondary ticket exchange shall not use a website address that contains the name of or a
name substantially similar to the name of the event, a performer at the event, or the venue to
which the ticket is for."
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective October 1, 2025.
House Bill 598-First Edition Page 3